Ohio, session 136, SB240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3780.221 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 3780.221. (A) For one or more of the purposes of 7
funding cultural, artistic, and entertainment opportunities in 8
the county and for the purpose of paying the expenses of 9
administering the tax, a board of county commissioners may levy 10
an excise tax on the retail sale of adult use marijuana, as that 11
term is defined in section 3780.22 of the Revised Code, in the 12
county. 13
The rate of the tax shall be expressed as a multiple of 14
one-quarter of one per cent of the price of adult use marijuana, 15
but shall not exceed three per cent in total when accounting for 16
all taxes levied under this section simultaneously by a county. 17
The tax is in addition to other taxes levied under this chapter 18
or Chapter 5739. or 5741. of the Revised Code. The tax may be 19

S. B. No. 240 Page 2
As Introduced
levied for any number of years not exceeding ten years. 20
The tax shall be levied pursuant to a resolution of the 21
board of county commissioners approved by a majority of the 22
electors in the county voting on the question of levying the 23
tax. The resolution shall specify the rate of the tax, the 24
number of years the tax will be levied, and the purposes for 25
which the tax is levied. The election may be held on the date of 26
a general or special election held not sooner than ninety days 27
after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board 28
of elections. If approved by the electors, the tax shall take 29
effect on the first day of the month specified in the resolution 30
but not sooner than the first day of the month that is at least 31
sixty days after the certification of the election results by 32
the board of elections. The board of county commissioners shall 33
certify a copy of the resolution levying the tax to the tax 34
commissioner at least sixty days prior to the date on which the 35
tax is to become effective. 36
(B) The form of the ballot in an election held to propose 37
a tax under division (A) of this section shall be as follows, or 38
in any other form acceptable to the secretary of state: 39
"For the purpose of __________ (insert the purpose or 40
purposes of the tax), shall an excise tax be levied throughout 41
___________ County at the rate of ____% of the price paid for 42
adult use marijuana for ____ years? 43
44
Yes For the tax
"
No Against the tax
(C) A tax approved under this section shall be paid by the 45

S. B. No. 240 Page 3
As Introduced
consumer to the vendor at the time of the sale, and the vendor 46
shall report and remit the tax to the state in the same manner, 47
on the same form, and at the same time as the vendor reports and 48
remits the tax levied under section 3780.22 of the Revised Code. 49
Except as otherwise provided in this section, and for all 50
purposes of the Revised Code, the tax levied under this section 51
shall be administered and enforced in the same manner as a tax 52
levied under section 5739.021 of the Revised Code. 53
(D) All money arising from a tax levied under this section 54
shall be credited as follows: 55
(1) To the tax refund fund created by section 5703.052 of 56
the Revised Code, amounts equal to the refunds attributable to 57
each tax levied under this section of the Revised Code and 58
certified by the tax commissioner pursuant to section 5739.07 of 59
the Revised Code; 60
(2) Following the crediting of amounts pursuant to 61
division (D)(1) of this section: 62
(a) To the permissive tax distribution fund created under 63
section 4301.423 of the Revised Code, an amount equal to ninety- 64
eight per cent of the remainder collected; 65
(b) To the local excise tax administrative fund created 66
under section 5743.021 of the Revised Code, an amount equal to 67
two per cent of such remainder, for use by the tax commissioner 68
in defraying costs incurred in administering the tax. 69
On or before the tenth day of each month, the tax 70
commissioner shall distribute the amount credited to the 71
permissive tax distribution fund during the preceding month by 72
providing for payment of the appropriate amount to the county 73
treasurer of the county in which the tax is levied. 74